California, session 20252026, SB687.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 3 (commencing with Section 1070) is added to Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: Article 3. Animal Chiropractic1070. As used in this article:(a) “Animal” means any living animal other than a human being.(b) “Animal chiropractic” means the evaluation and treatment of an animal’s vertebral or extremity joint dysfunction through spinal, joint, or musculoskeletal manipulative therapy or soft tissue therapy.(c) “Animal chiropractic practitioner” means a person licensed as a chiropractor by the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners and who holds a current, valid certification from any of the following:(1) The American Veterinary Chiropractic Association, unless otherwise specified by regulation.(2) The International Veterinary Chiropractic Association, unless otherwise specified by regulation.(3) Any other credentialing organization that the board specifies by regulation adopted under this article.(d) “Board” means the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners.(e) “Licensed veterinarian” means a person licensed by the Veterinary Medical Board pursuant to the Veterinary Medicine Practice Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 4800)). 1071. (a) A chiropractor who is not registered as an animal chiropractic practitioner by the board pursuant to this article shall not do either of the following if they are not under the supervision of a veterinarian:(1) Practice animal chiropractic.(2) Represent that the person is, or hold themselves out to the public as, an animal chiropractic practitioner.(b) All of the following apply to a chiropractor who is an animal chiropractic practitioner:(1) The chiropractor shall register with the board as an animal chiropractic practitioner in a manner specified by the board.(2) The chiropractor may provide animal chiropractic only to types of animals on which the animal chiropractic practitioner has received training.(3) The chiropractor may provide animal chiropractic without supervision by a licensed veterinarian.(4) The chiropractor shall obtain a completed application for care form for each animal evaluated or treated in accordance with subdivision (c).(5) The chiropractor shall maintain for at least three years a medical record for each animal evaluated or treated that includes the application for care form and, on request, shall provide the medical record to the animal’s veterinarian in a timely fashion.(c) Before providing animal chiropractic in accordance with this section, a chiropractor shall require the animal’s owner, owner’s agent, or another person responsible for the animal to complete and sign an application for care form that contains at least the following:(1) A statement that the chiropractor is not a licensed veterinarian and cannot maintain primary responsibility for the animal’s care.(2) A statement that animal chiropractic is not intended to replace traditional veterinary care and is considered an alternative therapy to be used concurrently and in conjunction with traditional veterinary care by a licensed veterinarian.(3) A question as to whether the animal has been seen by a licensed veterinarian within the past 12 months.(4) A question as to whether a licensed veterinarian has provided a diagnosis of the medical condition of the animal for which animal chiropractic is sought, and if so, a request to specify the diagnosis.(5) A statement authorizing the chiropractor to provide animal chiropractic to the animal.(d) The board shall maintain and make available to the public a list of animal chiropractic practitioners who are registered with the board pursuant to this section.(e) This section does not restrict a licensed veterinarian from engaging in the practice of veterinary medicine pursuant to the Veterinary Practice Act or prevent any other individual from lawfully acting in a manner pursuant to the scope of practice pursuant to this division.(f) An animal’s veterinarian is not liable for any actions or omissions of an animal chiropractic practitioner who provides animal chiropractic in accordance with this section.(g) (1) An animal chiropractic practitioner shall comply with all regulations of the board applicable to chiropractors, unless otherwise specified by the board by regulation.(2) The board may adopt regulations necessary to implement this article. The following regulations, if adopted, shall be adopted in consultation with the Veterinary Medical Board in accordance with paragraph (2):(A) Regulations regarding standards of medicine or care for an animal.(B) Regulations to remove or specify additional credentialing organizations for purposes of subdivision (c) of Section 1070.(3) When considering adopting, amending, or repealing a regulation, the board shall, in a timely manner, provide to the Veterinary Medical Board the full text of the regulation proposed to be adopted, amended, or repealed. The Veterinary Medical Board shall informally vote on whether to adopt, amend, or repeal the regulation at its next regularly scheduled meeting. Regardless of whether the vote is affirmative or not, the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners may proceed with the adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(h) A chiropractor who works under the supervision of a veterinarian is authorized to practice animal chiropractic without being registered by the board pursuant to this section. 1072. An animal chiropractic practitioner registered and practicing pursuant to this article is exempt from the provisions of the Veterinary Medicine Practice Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 4800). SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.